Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.260

Health professionals making reports, filing charges, or presenting evidence—Immunity.

Any member of a health profession listed under RCW 18.130.040 who, in good faith, makes a report, files charges, or presents evidence against another member of a health profession based on the claimed unprofessional conduct as provided in RCW 18.130.180 or inability to practice with reasonable skill and safety to consumers by reason of any physical or mental condition as provided in RCW 18.130.170 of such person before the agency, board, or commission responsible for disciplinary activities for the person's profession under chapter 18.130 RCW, shall be immune from civil action for damages arising out of such activities. A person prevailing upon the good faith defense provided for in this section is entitled to recover expenses and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense.

[ 2006 c 8 s 102; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 701; 1975 1st ex.s. c 114 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 144 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Part headings and subheadings not law—Severability—2006 c 8: See notes following RCW 5.64.010.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.